Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Soil and Water Conservation Districts

Cross references.

Construction of dams, §

12-5-370

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975).

For comment, “The Right to Rainwater: An Unlikely Fairy Tale,” see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 575 (2018).

2-6-20.
Short title.

This article may be known and cited as the “Soil and Water Conservation Districts Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 116, § 1.

2-6-21.
Legislative determinations and declarations of policy.

Legislative determinations. It is declared, as a matter of legislative determination:

The condition. That:

The farm, forest, and grazing lands of this state are among the basic assets of this state and the preservation of these lands is necessary to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of its people;

Improper land use practices have caused and have contributed to and are now causing and contributing to a progressively more serious erosion of the farm and grazing lands of this state by wind and water;

The breaking of natural grass, plant, and forest cover has interfered with the natural factors of soil stabilization, causing loosening of soil and exhaustion of humus and developing a soil condition that favors erosion;

The topsoil is being washed and blown out of fields and pastures;

There has been an accelerated washing of sloping fields;

These processes of erosion by wind and water speed up with removal of absorptive topsoil, causing exposure of less absorptive and less protective, but more erosive, subsoil; and

Failure by any landowner or occupier of land to conserve the soil and control erosion upon his lands causes a washing and blowing of soil and water from his lands onto other lands and makes the conservation of soil and control of erosion on such other lands difficult or impossible;

The consequences. That the consequences of such soil erosion in the form of soil washing and soil blowing are:

The silting and sedimentation of stream channels, reservoirs, dams, ditches, and harbors;

The loss of fertile soil material in dust storms;

The piling up of soil on lower slopes and its deposit over alluvial plains;

The reduction in productivity or outright ruin of rich bottom lands by overwash of poor subsoil material, sand, and gravel swept out of the hills;

The deterioration of the soil and its fertility, the deterioration of the crops grown thereon, and declining acre yields despite development of scientific processes for increasing such yields;

The loss of soil and water, which causes destruction of food and cover for wildlife;

A blowing and washing of soil into streams, which silts over spawning beds and destroys water plants, diminishing the food supply of fish;

A diminishing of the underground water reserve, which causes water shortages, intensifies periods of drought, and causes crop failures;

An increase in the speed and volume of rainfall runoff, causing severe and increasing floods which bring suffering, disease, and death;

The impoverishment of families attempting to farm eroding and eroded lands;

Damage to roads, highways, railways, farm buildings, and other property from floods and from dust storms; and

Losses in navigation, hydroelectric power, municipal water supply, irrigation developments, farming, and grazing; and

The appropriate corrective methods. That to conserve soil resources and control or prevent soil erosion, it is necessary that land use practices contributing to soil wastage and soil erosion be discouraged and discontinued and that appropriate soil-conserving land use practices be adopted and carried out and that among the procedures necessary for widespread adoption are:

The carrying on of engineering operations, such as the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches, and the like;

The utilization of strip cropping, lister furrowing, contour cultivating, and contour furrowing;

Land irrigation;

The seeding and planting of waste, sloping, abandoned, or eroded lands with water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses;

Forestation and reforestation;

The rotation of crops;

Soil stabilization with trees, grasses, legumes, and other thick-growing, soil-holding crops;

The addition of soil amendments, manurial materials, and fertilizers for the correction of soil deficiencies or for the promotion of increased growth of soil-protecting crops;

The retardation of runoff by increasing the absorption of rainfall; and

The retirement from cultivation of steep, highly erosive areas and areas badly gullied or otherwise eroded.

Declaration of policy. It is declared to be the policy of the General Assembly to provide for the conservation of the soil and soil resources of this state and for the control and prevention of soil erosion and thereby to preserve natural resources; control floods; prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs; assist in maintaining the navigability of rivers and harbors; preserve wildlife; protect the tax base; protect public lands; and protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 2.

2-6-22.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commission” or “State Soil and Water Conservation Commission” means the agency created in Code Section 2-6-23.

“District” or “soil and water conservation district” means an agency of this state organized in accordance with this article for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in this article.

“Due notice” means notice published at least twice, with an interval of at least seven days between the two publication dates, in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation within the appropriate area or, if no such publication of general circulation is available, notice given by posting at a reasonable number of conspicuous places within the appropriate area, including, where possible, public places where it is customary to post notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally. At any hearing held pursuant to such notice, at the time and place designated in such notice, adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity of renewing such notice for such adjourned dates.

“Land occupier” or “occupier of land” means any person, firm, or corporation, other than the owner, who is in possession of any lands lying within a soil and water conservation district, whether as lessee, renter, tenant, or otherwise.

“Landowner” or “owner of land” means any person, firm, or corporation who holds legal or equitable title to any lands lying within a soil and water conservation district.

“Qualified elector” means any person qualified to vote in elections by the people under the Constitution of this state.

“Supervisor” means one of the members of the governing body of a soil and water conservation district, elected or appointed in accordance with this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 116, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 1.

Cross references.

Construction of dams, §

12-5-370

et seq.

2-6-23.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission — Established; composition; terms of office; ex officio advisers; seal; rules and regulations.

There is established, to serve as an agency of the state and to perform the functions conferred upon it in this article, the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission. The commission shall be assigned to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

Commencing with appointments for the year 2015, the Governor shall appoint one at-large member from each of the five soil and water conservation district regions to serve on the commission. Such initial appointments shall be for terms of office of one, two, three, four, and five years, respectively. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed for terms of office of five years and until their successors are duly appointed.

The following persons shall serve ex officio in an advisory capacity to the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission:

The associate dean for extension of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia;

The commissioner of natural resources;

The associate dean of research of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia;

The executive director of the Agricultural Stabilization Conservation Service;

The Georgia state director of the Farmer’s Home Administration;

The director of the Southern Piedmont Conservation Research Center;

The president of the Georgia Association of Conservation District Supervisors;

The director of the State Forestry Commission;

The Georgia supervisor of national forests of the U.S. Forestry Service;

The state conservationist of the U.S. Natural Resources Conservation Service;

The dean and director of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia;

The director of the Career, Technical, and Agricultural Education Division of the Department of Education;

The Commissioner of Agriculture; and

Such other representatives of state or federal agencies as the commission deems desirable.

The commission shall adopt a seal, which shall be judicially noticed. It may perform such acts, hold such public hearings, and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the execution of its functions under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 4; Ga. L. 1945, p. 190, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 584, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 116, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 929, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 35, § 1/HB 397; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 2/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “director of the Career, Technical, and Agricultural Education Division of the Department of Education” for “state program manager of agricultural education” in paragraph (c)(12).

2-6-24.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission — Chairperson; quorum; compensation; surety bonds; records; audits.

The commission shall designate one of its members as chairperson and may, from time to time, change such designation. A member of the commission shall hold office so long as he or she retains the office by virtue of which he or she is serving on the commission. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority shall be required for the determination of any matter within its duties. The members of the commission shall receive for each day of actual attendance of meetings of the commission a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 and shall be entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties on the commission. The commission shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who are entrusted with funds or property. It shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted and shall provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 951, § 1.

2-6-25.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission — Employment of administrative officer, experts, agents, and employees; legal services; delegation of powers and duties; furnishing of information; agency cooperation.

The commission may employ an administrative officer and such technical experts and other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require. It shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The commission may call upon the Attorney General of this state for such legal services as it may require. It shall have authority to delegate, to one or more of its members or to one or more agents or employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The commission is authorized to furnish information and to call upon any or all state or local agencies for cooperation in carrying out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 724, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 4.

2-6-26.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission — Merit and retirement systems for employees.

All employees of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, not including members of the commission, shall be subject to a merit system of employment as promulgated by the commission, under which all such employees shall be selected on a basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency, according to law. All such employees are authorized to become and be members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, as established by Chapter 2 of Title 47. There shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the operation of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission all employer contributions required by Chapter 2 of Title 47 creating the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. All rights, credits, and funds in such retirement system which were possessed by persons at the time of their employment by the commission are continued and preserved, it being the intention of the General Assembly that such persons shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they may be entitled prior to becoming employees of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 908, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 5.

2-6-27.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission — Additional duties and powers.

In addition to the duties and powers otherwise conferred upon the commission, it shall have the following duties and powers:

To offer such assistance as may be appropriate to the supervisors of the soil and water conservation districts in the carrying out of any of their powers and programs;

To keep the supervisors of each of the districts informed of the activities and experiences of all the other districts and to facilitate an interchange of advice, experience, and cooperation between such districts;

To coordinate the programs of the districts so far as this may be done by advice and consultation;

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies and of the agencies and counties of this state in the work of such districts;

To disseminate information throughout this state concerning the activities and programs of the districts and to encourage the formation of such districts in areas where their organization is desirable;

To receive gifts, appropriations, materials, equipment, land, and facilities and to manage, operate, and disperse the same;

To formulate such rules and regulations, to exercise such powers, and to perform such duties as are necessary to implement the administration of the federal Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act;

(7.1)

To formulate such rules and regulations in consultation with the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, to exercise such powers, and to perform such duties as are necessary to implement the administration of the education and training program established under Code Section 12-7-19;

To enter into contracts and agreements with the districts, municipalities, and counties of this state, other agencies of this state, the United States and any agencies thereof, any association, any landowner or land occupier, or any person in order to carry out the purposes of this article; and

To receive grants from any agency of the United States government or any agency of this state, and to make grants to districts, municipalities, or counties in this state, or other state agencies in order to:

Fund up to 20 percent of the cost of obtaining permits for and constructing improvements to any dam that was originally constructed or financially assisted by the Natural Resources Conservation Service, formerly known as the Soil Conservation Service, of the United States Department of Agriculture; or

Carry out other purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 4; Ga. L. 1949, p. 584, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 116, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1336, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 813, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 1-2/SB 342; Ga. L. 2015, p. 35, § 2/HB 397; Ga. L. 2018, p. 974, § 1/SB 451.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former paragraph (7.2), which read: “To formulate such rules and regulations and to exercise such powers as are necessary to perform its duties under subsection (m.1) of Code Section 12-5-31 and subsection (b.1) of Code Section 12-5-105;”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 1-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This part shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Water Conservation and Drought Relief Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 5-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all applications pending on or after the effective date thereof. The effective date was July 1, 2008.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2003 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2004).

U.S. Code.

The federal Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act, referred to in paragraph (7), is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 1001

et seq. and

33 U.S.C. § 701

b.

2-6-28.
Number and boundaries of soil and water conservation districts; alteration of existing districts or formation of new districts.

The number and geographical boundaries of the several soil and water conservation districts shall remain as they existed on July 1, 1973, unless changed as provided in this Code section.

If two-thirds of the supervisors within each of the affected districts, each of the governing authorities of each county within any affected district, and the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission agree to the alteration of any district or the formation of any new district, the alteration or formation may be effected if all such approvals are filed with the commission along with the description of the altered boundaries or the boundaries of the new districts. The alteration of existing districts or formation of new districts may not be effected so that the boundaries of any such district will traverse the boundaries of any regional commission within the district or districts. All of the property and assets of any altered district shall be distributed among the affected districts in accordance to the same ratio used in the distribution of state appropriated funds to the affected districts.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 929, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 11/HB 1216.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the hyphen in “state appropriated” near the end of subsection (b) was deleted.

2-6-29.
District supervisors — Number; appointment, qualifications, and terms of appointive supervisors; county basis of election of elected supervisors.

The governing body of each district shall consist of not less than five supervisors. Two supervisors shall be appointed by the commission, provided that in those districts which contain three or more counties or portions of three or more counties, the commission shall appoint one supervisor for each county in the district. Appointments by the commission shall be made from a list submitted to the commission by the elected supervisors of the district, containing three nominees for each appointive position. The supervisors appointed by the commission shall be persons who are qualified by training and experience to perform the specialized, skilled services which will be required of them in the performance of their duties under this article. Appointed supervisors shall serve for terms of office of two years and until their successors are appointed.

Elected supervisors shall be elected upon a county basis, as provided in Code Section 2-6-30. Not more than one elected supervisor shall be elected from each county within a district, except in districts consisting of less than three counties.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 7; Ga. L. 1949, p. 584, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 929, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 8.

2-6-30.
District supervisors — Election procedure for elected supervisors.

Within 30 days after the date of issuance by the Secretary of State of a certificate of organization for a soil and water conservation district, nominating petitions may be filed with the commission to nominate candidates for supervisors of such district. The commission shall have authority to extend the time within which nominating petitions may be filed. No such nominating petition shall be accepted by the commission unless it is subscribed by 25 or more qualified electors of the county in which the nominee resides. Qualified electors may sign more than one such nominating petition to nominate more than one candidate for supervisor.

The commission shall be required to give due notice of an election only in the particular county in which an election is to be held. The ballot for each county shall contain only the names of the nominees from that county and the electors of each county shall be eligible to vote only for the nominees of their particular county. The names of all nominees within the county on behalf of whom nominating petitions have been filed within the time designated shall appear upon the ballots arranged in the alphabetical order of their surnames, with a square before each name and a direction to insert an “X” in the square appearing before the name of the person for whom the elector desires to vote. The nominee receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared the duly elected district supervisor from that county.

The commission shall pay all the expenses of such election, shall supervise the conduct thereof, shall prescribe regulations governing the conduct of such election and the determination of the eligibility of voters therein, and shall publish the results thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 6; Ga. L. 1949, p. 584, § 6; Ga. L. 1950, p. 293, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 9.

Cross references.

Definition of public office, §

21-2-2

.

Disclosure reports, §

21-5-34

.

2-6-31.
District supervisors — Chairman; terms of office of elected supervisors; filling vacancies; quorum; compensation and expenses.

The supervisors shall designate a chairman and from time to time may change such designation.

The term of office of each elected supervisor shall be four years, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (2) of this subsection. An elected supervisor shall hold office until his or her successor has been elected and has qualified. Successors to elected supervisors shall be elected at the general election immediately preceding the expiration of terms and shall take office the first day of January immediately following that election.

The terms of those persons elected as supervisors in 2003 and whose terms have not expired as of the date that implementation of this paragraph is permissible under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, shall expire on December 31, 2008.

The terms of those persons elected as supervisors in 2004 and whose terms have not expired as of the date that implementation of this paragraph is permissible under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, shall expire on December 31, 2008.

The terms of those persons elected as supervisors in 2005 shall expire on December 31, 2010.

The terms of those persons elected as supervisors in 2006 shall expire on December 31, 2010.

If any persons were elected as supervisors on or after January 1, 2007, but prior to the date that implementation of this paragraph is permissible under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, then the terms of such persons shall expire on December 31, 2012.

Any vacancy in the office an appointed supervisor shall be filled for the unexpired term. The selection of any person to fill an unexpired term of an appointed supervisor shall be made in the same manner in which the original appointment was made.

Any vacancy occurring in the office of an elected supervisor shall be filled as follows:

If the vacancy occurs more than 90 days prior to the date of a general election preceding the general election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term of office, then such vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term of office at a special election to be held on the same date as said general election preceding the general election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term of office; and in such case the Governor shall select a qualified person from among two persons nominated by the remaining supervisors of the district to fill the vacancy until the person elected at such special election takes office; and

If the vacancy does not occur more than 90 days prior to the date of a general election preceding the general election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term of office, then the Governor shall select a qualified person from among two persons nominated by the remaining supervisors of the district to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

A majority of the supervisors shall constitute a quorum; and the concurrence of a majority of the supervisors in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determination.

The commission is authorized to fix a per diem payment for supervisors; in addition thereto, such supervisors shall be entitled to the regular mileage allowances provided for state employees if such supervisors travel by private conveyance and to their actual travel expenses if they travel by public conveyance.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 7; Ga. L. 1951, p. 695, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 929, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 10; Ga. L. 2007, p. 276, § 1/SB 263.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 276, § 2/SB 263, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The Attorney General of Georgia shall cause this Act to be submitted for preclearance under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, and such submission shall be made to the United States Department of Justice or filed with the appropriate court no later than 45 days after the date on which this Act is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval.
If as of June 30, 2008, implementation of this Act is not permissible under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, then as of such date this Act shall be void and shall stand repealed in its entirety.” The United States Department of Justice precleared the Act under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973c, on December 20, 2007.

2-6-32.
District supervisors — Services of county agricultural agents; employees and agents; copies of rules, orders, and other documents; surety bonds; removal of supervisor; consultation.

The supervisors of a district may utilize the services of the county agricultural agents and the facilities of the county agricultural agents’ offices insofar as practicable and feasible. With the approval of the commission they may employ additional employees and agents, permanent and temporary, as they may require and may determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to one or more supervisors, or to one or more agents or employees such powers and duties as they may deem proper.

The supervisors shall furnish to the commission, upon request, copies of such rules, regulations, orders, contracts, forms, and other documents as they shall adopt or employ and such other information concerning their activities as the commission may require in the performance of its duties under this article.

The supervisors shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who are entrusted with funds or property. They shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted and shall provide to the commission summary financial data listing cash receipts and disbursements for each state fiscal year.

Any supervisor may be removed by the commission, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason.

The supervisors of a district may invite the legislative body of any municipality or county located near the territory comprised within the district to designate a representative to advise and consult with the supervisors on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such municipality or county.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 206, § 1.

2-6-33.
Powers of districts and supervisors; prerequisites to exercise.

A soil and water conservation district shall be an agency of this state. Such district and the supervisors thereof shall have, in addition to other powers granted in this article, the following powers; provided, however, that before the supervisors shall have the authority to exercise any of the powers conferred in this Code section, they shall formulate and submit to the commission for its approval a program or programs of projects and operations, proposed changes in which may be submitted for the approval of the commission from time to time, and shall not undertake any of such work until after such program or programs shall have been approved in writing by the commission; and provided, further, that no provision with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by public bodies of this state shall be applicable to a district unless the General Assembly shall specifically so state:

To conduct surveys, investigations, and research relating to the character of soil erosion and the preventive and control measures needed; to publish the results of such surveys, investigations, or research; and to disseminate information concerning such preventive and control measures, provided that in order to avoid duplication of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation with the government of this state or any of its agencies or with the government of the United States or any of its agencies;

To conduct demonstrational projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district, upon obtaining the consent of the owner and occupiers of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods, and measures by which soil and soil resources may be conserved and soil erosion in the form of soil blowing and soil washing may be prevented and controlled;

To carry out preventive and control measures within the district, including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in the use of land, and the measures listed in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 2-6-21, on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district, upon obtaining the consent of the owner and the occupiers of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands;

To cooperate and enter into agreements with and, within the limits of appropriations duly made available to the district by law, to furnish financial or other aid to any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any owner or occupier of lands within the district, in the carrying on of erosion control or prevention operations within the district, subject to such conditions as the supervisors may deem necessary to advance the purposes of this article;

To obtain options upon and to acquire, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any property, real or personal, or any rights or interests therein; to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired; to receive income from such properties and to expend such income in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or interests therein, in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this article, provided that title to all property acquired shall be taken in the name of the State of Georgia;

To make available to landowners and occupiers of land within the district, on such terms as it prescribes, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds and seedlings, and such other material or equipment as will assist such landowners and occupiers of land to carry on operations upon their lands for the conservation of soil resources and for the prevention or control of soil erosion;

To construct, improve, and maintain such structures as may be necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the operations authorized in this article;

To develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of soil resources and for the control and prevention of soil erosion within the district, which plans shall specify, in such detail as may be possible, the acts, procedures, performances, and avoidances which are necessary or desirable for the effectuation of such plans, including engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices, and changes in the use of land; and to publish such plans and information and bring them to the attention of owners and occupiers of lands within the district;

To take over, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to administer any soil conservation, erosion control, or erosion prevention project located within its boundaries which was first undertaken by the United States or any of its agencies or by this state or any of its agencies; to manage, as agent of the United States or any of its agencies or of this state or any of its agencies, any soil conservation, erosion control, or erosion prevention project within its boundaries; to act as agent for the United States or any of its agencies or for this state or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any soil conservation, erosion control, or erosion prevention project within its boundaries; to accept donations, gifts, and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise from the United States or any of its agencies, from this state or any of its agencies, or from others and to use or expend such money, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying on its operations, including promotion of conservation and conservation education;

To have a seal, which shall be judicially noticed; to have perpetual succession unless terminated as provided in this article; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; and to make, amend, and repeal rules and regulations not inconsistent with this article, in order to carry into effect its purposes and powers.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 116, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 207, § 1.

2-6-34.
Conditions to extending benefits or performing work.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this article to or the performance of any work upon any lands not owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, the supervisors of a district may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise to any operations conferring such benefits and may require landowners and occupiers of land to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as to the permanent use of such lands as will tend to prevent or control erosion thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 8.

2-6-35.
Land use regulations — Adoption authorized; public hearings.

The supervisors of each district shall have authority to formulate regulations governing the use of lands within the district, in the interest of conserving soil and soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion. The supervisors may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon proposed regulations as may be necessary to assist them in this work.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 9.

Cross references.

Rules, regulations, and ordinances adopted by Board of Natural Resources and local governments for purpose of governing certain land-disturbing activities, §

12-7-6

.

2-6-36.
Land use regulations — Referendum.

The supervisors shall not have the authority to adopt land use regulations until after they shall have caused due notice to be given of their intention to conduct a referendum for submission of such regulations to the owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district, for their indication of approval or disapproval of such proposed regulations, and until after the supervisors have considered the result of such referendum. No proposed regulations shall be submitted in a referendum until after they have been submitted to and approved in writing by the commission. Copies of such proposed regulations shall be available for the inspection of all eligible voters during the period between the publication of the notice and the date of the referendum. The notice of the referendum shall recite the contents of the proposed regulations or shall state where copies of such proposed regulations may be examined.

The question shall be submitted by ballots, upon which the words:

Click to view

The supervisors shall supervise such referendum, shall prescribe appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof, and shall publish the result thereof.

All owners of lands within the district, and only such landowners, shall be eligible to vote in the referendum.

No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate the referendum or the result thereof, if notice thereof was given substantially as provided in this Code section and if the referendum was conducted fairly.

The supervisors shall not have the authority to adopt proposed regulations unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum were cast for approval of the proposed regulations. However, the approval of the proposed regulations by a majority of the votes cast in such referendum shall not be deemed to require the supervisors to adopt such proposed regulations.

“[ ] YES
Shall the proposed land use regulations for conser- [ ] NO
vation of soil and prevention of erosion be approved?” shall appear, with directions that all persons desiring to vote for approval of the regulations shall vote “Yes” and all persons desiring to vote against the regulations shall vote “No.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 9; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 13.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the comma after “ ‘erosion be approved?’ ” in subsection (b) was deleted.